Virginia statutes. Title 13.1. Corporations.
Chapter 13. Virginia Professional Limited Liability Company Act.
§ 13.1-1117.
Conversion into nonprofessional company; disposition of membership interests of deceased or disqualified members.

A professional limited liability company organized under this chapter shall continue until dissolved in accordance with other provisions of this chapter or the provisions of Article 9 (§

13.1-1046

et seq.) of Chapter 12 of this title.

Whenever all members of a professional limited liability company licensed under this chapter cease at any one time and for any reason to be licensed, certified or registered in the particular field of endeavor for which the professional limited liability company was organized, or by the vote of the holders of at least two-thirds of its membership interests, the professional limited liability company thereupon shall be treated as converted into, and shall operate henceforth solely as, a limited liability company under applicable provisions of this title, exclusive of this chapter, but may be reconverted upon removal of the disability or by the vote of the holders of at least two-thirds of its membership interests.

Following the occurrence of any event that terminates the continued membership of a member in a professional limited liability company, including a disqualification that terminates a member’s membership as provided in §

13.1-1116

, the limited liability company shall pay to the former member or the former member’s successor in interest the value of the interest of the former member. The time of payment and value of the interest of the former member shall be determined in the manner provided in writing in the articles of organization or an operating agreement of the limited liability company, and to the extent not so provided in the articles of organization or an operating agreement, the payment shall be made within one year following the occurrence of the event that terminates the former member’s membership and for the book value of the interest, determined as of the end of the month immediately preceding the event that terminated the membership of the former member. If applicable, the book value shall be determined from the books and records of the limited liability company in accordance with the generally accepted accounting principles on the accrual method of accounting. No subsequent adjustment of this book value, whether by the limited liability company itself, by federal income tax audit made and agreed to, or by a court decision which has become final, shall alter the amount of the payment to be made.

An arrangement or provision in the articles of organization, operating agreement or by contract may be made to transfer any membership interest held by a disqualified charitable remainder trust to the professional limited liability company or to persons qualified to hold such an interest under §

13.1-1103

, whether made before or after the disqualification of a charitable remainder trust, provided that the membership interest involved shall have been so transferred within one year following such disqualification.

History.

1992, c. 574; 1995, c. 168; 1996, c. 265; 1999, c. 100; 2009, c. 763.

The 1999 amendment

added subsection D.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 763, in the first sentence of subsection C, deleted “including a disqualification that terminates membership as provided in §

13.1-1116

” following “any event” and substituted “including a disqualification that terminates a member’s membership as provided in §

13.1-1116

” for “if the professional limited liability company has been continued as provided in §

13.1-1046

, then” and “the former member’s successor” for “his or its successor.”

§ 13.1-1118.
Management.

Unless the articles of organization or an operating agreement provides for management of a professional limited liability company by a manager or managers, management of a professional limited liability company shall be vested in its members. If the articles of organization or an operating agreement provides for management of a professional limited liability company by a manager or managers, the manager shall be an individual or professional business entity duly licensed or otherwise legally authorized to render the same professional services within this Commonwealth that the professional limited liability company was organized for the purpose of rendering. Only members or managers duly licensed or otherwise legally authorized to render the same professional services within this Commonwealth shall supervise and direct the provision of professional services within this Commonwealth, or delegate to their agents, officers, and employees or delegate by a management agreement or another agreement with, or otherwise to, other persons managerial duties and tasks related to the professional limited liability company’s operations.

History.

1992, c. 574; 2007, c. 629.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 629 inserted “or delegate to their agents, officers, and employees or delegate by a management agreement or another agreement with, or otherwise to, other persons managerial duties and tasks related to the professional limited liability company’s operations” at the end.

§ 13.1-1119.
Repealed by Acts 2002, ch. 346.

Editor’s note.

Former §

13.1-1119

, relating to local business licenses, was enacted by Acts 1992, c. 574.

§ 13.1-1120.
Income and property taxes.

All professional limited liability companies organized or qualifying under the provisions of this chapter shall be treated for income tax purposes under the provisions of Chapter 3 (§

58.1-300

et seq.) of Title 58.1 in the manner determined under §

58.1-301

, and property owned by professional limited liability companies shall be taxed in the actual form in which it may exist and not as capital.

History.

1992, c. 574.

§ 13.1-1121.
Merger.

A professional limited liability company operating pursuant to the terms of this chapter may merge with one or more corporations, limited liability companies, or domestic partnerships only if the surviving corporation, limited liability company, or domestic partnership is a professional corporation, a professional limited liability company, or a domestic partnership all of the partners of which are professional corporations, professional limited liability companies, or individuals duly licensed or otherwise legally authorized to render the same professional services as those for which the surviving professional corporation, professional limited liability company or domestic partnership was incorporated or organized.

History.

1992, c. 574; 1996, c. 265; 2008, c. 509.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 509 inserted “domestic” preceding “partnership” throughout this section, substituted “may merge with one or more corporations, limited liability companies, or domestic partnerships” for “may consolidate or merge with another corporation, limited liability company, or partnership” near the beginning, and made a minor stylistic change.

§ 13.1-1122.
Application of Chapter 12 of this title.

The provisions of Chapter 12 (§

13.1-1000

et seq.) of this title shall be applicable to professional limited liability companies organized under the provisions of this chapter. Where a conflict arises between the provisions found in Chapter 12 (§

13.1-1000

et seq.) of this title and this chapter, this chapter shall control.

History.

1992, c. 574.

§ 13.1-1123.
Coordination with other provisions of Virginia Code.

For purposes of all sections of this Code other than sections in Chapter 7 (§

13.1-542.1

et seq.) and in this chapter, whenever the term “professional corporation” is used, that term shall be deemed to include a professional limited liability company, and wherever the terms “shareholder,” “employee,” “officer” or “agent” are used, those terms shall be deemed to include, as appropriate, the terms member, manager, employee, and agent.

History.

1992, c. 574; 2007, cc. 233, 639; 2022, c. 234.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 233 and 639 are identical, and inserted “all sections of” and “other than sections in Chapter 7 (§

13.1-542

et seq.) and in this chapter.”

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 234 substituted “§

13.1-542.1

” for “§

13.1-542

.”